Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 8

Sex Offenders

33-6-801. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Sex crime” means any offense involving the unlawful sexual abuse, molestation, fondling, or carnal knowledge of a child of fourteen (14) years of age or under or incest, a crime against nature, assault with intent to commit rape or rape; and

“Sex offender” means any person who has been convicted of a crime involving the unlawful sexual abuse, molestation, fondling, or carnal knowledge of a child of fourteen (14) years of age or under or any person convicted of incest, a crime against nature, assault with intent to commit rape or rape.

Acts 1957, ch. 288, § 1; 1963, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; 1977, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 224, § 25; T.C.A., §§ 33-1301, 33-6-301; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6, §§ 33-6-101 — 33-6-111; 33-6-201 — 33-6-209; 33-6-301 — 33-6-306 (Acts 1957, ch. 288, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1963, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 37-40, 43, 45, 46; 1967, ch. 44, § 1; 1967, ch. 58, § 1;1973, ch. 127, § 11; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 43, 45, 46, 52, 53; 1975, ch. 199, §§ 1-3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 14, 16-18; 1976, ch. 610, § 1; 1976, ch. 763, § 5; 1976, ch. 764, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 165, § 1; 1977, ch. 386, § 2; 1977, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 527, §§ 5, 6; 1980, ch. 621, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 25-27; 1981, ch. 445, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(21); 1981, ch. 536, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 1, 3-11; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 8, 9, 11, 13, 14, 17-22, 24; T.C.A., § 33-314, 33-325, 33-603, 33-601, 33-604, 33-606 — 33-609, 33-614 — 33-619; 33-379 — 33-381, 33-1301 — 33-1305, 33-3-620 — 33-3-622, 33-6-203 — 33-6-205; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8, 11-16, 23-25, 27, 28-32, 39, 40; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 14-25; 1985, ch. 478, § 37; Acts 1986, ch. 595, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 836, §§ 4, 6; 1987, ch. 145, § 26; 1988, ch. 862, §§ 1-5; 1988, ch 953, § 8; 1989, ch. 99, § 1; 1989, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 3, 15-17; 1990, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 991, §§ 15, 16; 1993, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 376, §§ 1-4; 1994, ch. 676, § 1; 1994, ch. 779, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 57-66; 2000, ch. 947, § 6), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Definitions applicable throughout title, § 33-1-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 19.

Collateral References.

Applicability, in proceedings under statutes relating to sexual psychopaths, of constitutional provisions for the protection of a person accused of crime. 34 A.L.R.3d 652.

33-6-802. Examination upon conviction for sex crime.

Any person convicted of a sex crime shall be examined thoroughly by a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, licensed psychological examiner, licensed senior psychological examiner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatry, licensed professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker from the department of correction as soon as practicable after admittance to the penal facility. A community mental health center may provide the examination when the service is specifically contracted for and funded by the department of mental health and substance abuse services or the department of correction.

Acts 1957, ch. 288, § 3; 1974, ch. 802, § 52; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 26; T.C.A., § 33-1303; Acts 1986, ch. 595, § 1; 1989, ch. 311, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-6-303; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2001, ch. 334, § 6; 2002, ch. 730, § 46; 2010, ch. 1100, § 45; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Collateral References.

Standard of proof required under statute providing for commitment of sexual offenders or sexual psychopaths. 96 A.L.R.3d 840.

33-6-803. Certification for treatment.

If, as a result of the examination provided for in § 33-6-802, it is found that the convicted person is capable of being successfully treated, this fact shall be certified by the examining official or officials to the commissioner of correction, together with the suggested treatment, whereupon, the commissioner of correction shall provide the treatment.

Acts 1957, ch. 288, § 4; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-1304; Acts 1989, ch. 311, § 2; T.C.A., § 33-6-304; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Collateral References.

Jurisdiction of court to permit sterilization of mentally defective person in absence of specific statutory authority. 74 A.L.R.3d 1210.

33-6-804. Examination prior to release — Petition for commitment.

Not more than one (1) year nor less than six (6) months prior to the non-parole release of any person convicted of a sex crime, an examination of the person shall be made by a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, licensed senior psychological examiner, licensed psychological examiner, clinical nurse specialist in psychiatry, licensed professional counselor, or licensed clinical social worker from the department of correction.

The examiner shall determine whether the person has a mental illness and, because of that illness, poses a likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501, and is in need of care and treatment in a mental hospital or treatment resource, as defined in § 33-1-101.

If the examiner determines that the person has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance and poses a likelihood of serious harm because of the illness, the director of the correctional facility shall, before the time for the release of the person, petition where the facility is located for judicial commitment under chapter 6, part 5, of this title to a hospital or treatment resource designated by the commissioner.

Acts 1957, ch. 288, § 5; 1974, ch. 802, § 53; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; 1977, ch. 386, § 2; 1981, ch. 224, § 27; 1983, ch. 323, § 24; T.C.A., § 33-1305; Acts 1986, ch. 595, § 2; 1989, ch. 311, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., § 33-6-305; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2001, ch. 334, § 7; 2002, ch. 730, § 47.

Collateral References.

Liability of one releasing institutionalized mental patient for harm he causes. 38 A.L.R.3d 699.

33-6-805. Post-plea treatment system.

The department of mental health and substance abuse services, in cooperation with the department of correction, the department of human services and the district attorneys general conference, shall develop a post-plea treatment system for sexual offenders, victims, and their families, modeled after systems that are operating in some local communities around the country. The system shall provide for a standard fee for treatment services and shall provide for the development of a certification process for service providers to assure sexual abuse treatment expertise by the service providers. The certification should encompass a combination of professional education and licensure with specialized knowledge in this field. The treatment system shall be designed within a conceptual framework that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Limiting offender eligibility to first-offender, intra-family abuse, absence of violence or threat of violence, sexual abuse of short duration, absence of drug or alcohol addiction, and abuse that has resulted in no significant trauma to the child victim;

The sentence and probation established for program participants shall be a definite sentence; and

As a requirement for participation in the treatment program, the offender shall plead guilty to the commission of the appropriate sexual offense and agree to abide by all requirements of the probation agreement or sentence alternative.

The probation agreement or sentence alternative shall require that the offender pay for the victim's medical and psychological treatment, as needed, and for the offender's treatment in the treatment program, based upon the offender's financial ability to pay.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 37; 1987, ch. 145, § 26; 1988, ch. 953, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-6-306; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 45; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Sexual abuse treatment program for incarcerated sex offenders, § 41-21-235.